California, session 20252026, AB1013.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13515.27 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13515.27. (a) (1) The commission shall establish and keep updated a classroom-based continuing training course that includes instructor-led active learning, such as scenario-based training, relating to behavioral health and law enforcement interaction with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(2) The commission may partner with local departments of behavioral health, community-based organizations, or nonprofit organizations to establish and keep updated the classroom-based continuing training course.(b) This course shall be at least three consecutive hours, may include training scenarios and facilitated learning activities, shall address issues related to stigma, shall be culturally relevant and appropriate, and shall include all of the following topics:(1) The cause and nature of mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(2) Indicators of mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(3) Appropriate responses to a variety of situations involving persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(4) Conflict resolution and deescalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations.(5) Appropriate language usage when interacting with potentially emotionally distressed persons.(6) Resources available to serve persons with mental illness or intellectual disability.(7) The perspective of individuals or families who have experiences with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(c) The course described in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be made available by the commission to (1) The commission shall provide the course described in subdivisions (a) and (b) to each law enforcement officer with a rank of supervisor or below and who is assigned to patrol duties or to supervise officers who are assigned to patrol duties.(2) A law enforcement officer with a rank of supervisor or below and who is assigned to patrol duties or to supervise officers who are assigned to patrol duties shall complete the course developed pursuant to this section.(d) The commission shall implement this section on or before August 1, 2016. 2026.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.